Georgia statutes. TITLE 23 Equity
Article 7 Nonperformance of Contract

Cross references.

Effect of decree for specific performance as deed to convey land or other property, §

9-11-70

.

Right of buyer to specific performance in regard to contract for sale of goods, §

11-2-716

.

23-2-130.
When specific performance decreed generally.

Specific performance of a contract, if within the power of the party, will be decreed, generally, whenever the damages recoverable at law would not be an adequate compensation for nonperformance.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 3118; Code 1868, § 3130; Code 1873, § 3186; Code 1882, § 3186; Civil Code 1895, § 4036; Civil Code 1910, § 4633; Code 1933, § 37-801.

23-2-131.
When specific performance of parol contract for land decreed; sufficient part performance.

The specific performance of a parol contract as to land shall be decreed if the defendant admits the contract or if the contract has been so far executed by the party seeking relief and at the instance or by the inducements of the other party that if the contract were abandoned he could not be restored to his former position.

Full payment alone accepted by the vendor, or partial payment accompanied with possession, or possession alone with valuable improvements, if clearly proved in each case to have been done with reference to the parol contract, shall be sufficient part performance to justify a decree.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 3119; Code 1868, § 3131; Code 1873, § 3187; Code 1882, § 3187; Civil Code 1895, § 4037; Civil Code 1910, § 4634; Code 1933, § 37-802.

Cross references.

Form of complaint for specific performance of written contract to convey land, §

9-11-112

.

Law reviews.

For survey article on real property, see 34 Mercer L. Rev. 255 (1982).

23-2-132.
When voluntary agreement enforced.

Specific performance will not be decreed of a voluntary agreement or merely gratuitous promise. If, however, possession of lands has been given under such an agreement, upon a meritorious consideration, and valuable improvements have been made upon the faith thereof, equity will decree the performance of the agreement.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 3121; Code 1868, § 3133; Code 1873, § 3189; Code 1882, § 3189; Civil Code 1895, § 4039; Civil Code 1910, § 4636; Code 1933, § 37-804.

23-2-133.
Inadequacy of price; unfair or unjust contracts.

Mere inadequacy of price, though not sufficient to rescind a contract, may justify a court in refusing to decree a specific performance, as may any other fact showing the contract to be unfair, unjust, or against good conscience.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 3122; Code 1868, § 3134; Code 1873, § 3190; Code 1882, § 3190; Civil Code 1895, § 4040; Civil Code 1910, § 4637; Code 1933, § 37-805.

Law reviews.

For comment on Jones v. Smith,

206 Ga. 162

,

56 S.E.2d 462

(1949), see 12 Ga. B.J. 333 (1950).

23-2-134.
Vendor’s ability to comply.

The vendor seeking specific performance shall show an ability to comply substantially with his contract in every part and as to all the property. However, a vendor’s want of title or other inability as to part of the property shall not be a good answer to the vendee seeking performance who is willing to accept title to part of the property, receiving compensation for the other part. If the defects in the vendor’s title are trifling or comparatively small, equity shall decree at his instance, granting compensation for such defects.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 3123; Code 1868, § 3135; Code 1873, § 3191; Code 1882, § 3191; Civil Code 1895, § 4041; Civil Code 1910, § 4638; Code 1933, § 37-806.

Law reviews.

For article discussing the historical background of the doctrine of tender and the application in Georgia of tender requirements, and proposing reforms, see 21 Mercer L. Rev. 413 (1969).

23-2-135.
Damages when specific performance impossible.

If, for any cause, specific performance is impossible or if the vendee declines to accept a performance in part, the court may proceed to assess damages for the breach of the contract.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 3124; Code 1868, § 3136; Code 1873, § 3192; Code 1882, § 3192; Civil Code 1895, § 4042; Civil Code 1910, § 4639; Code 1933, § 37-807.

23-2-136.
Specific personalty; damages or delivery.

Any good reason in equity and good conscience why the complainant should have the possession of specific personalty to which he has title shall sustain an action for specific performance or delivery and, unless rebutted by other equitable reasons, shall justify a decree. The jury in such cases may decree either damages or specific delivery.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 3120; Code 1868, § 3132; Code 1873, § 3188; Code 1882, § 3188; Civil Code 1895, § 4038; Civil Code 1910, § 4635; Code 1933, § 37-803.